Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.294

Collection of debts—Report.

Institutions of higher education shall report to the governor and the higher education committees of the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 annually beginning on December 1, 2020, on transcript and registration holds used as debt collection tools, including:

(1) Each institution's policy on when transcript and registration holds are used, including the time frames and amounts for which holds are to be used and the lowest amount for which an institution assigns a debt to a third-party collection agency;

(2) The number of official transcripts and registration privileges being withheld by each institution; and

(3) The number of past-due accounts assigned to third-party collection agencies.

[ 2020 c 281 s 2.]